Utah statutes.
63G-1-501.   State flag.
The state flag of Utah shall be a flag of blue field, fringed, with gold
borders, with the following device worked in natural colors on the center of
the blue field:
The center a shield; above the shield and thereon an American eagle with
outstretched wings; the top of the shield pierced with six arrows arranged
crosswise; upon the shield under the arrows the word "Industry," and below the
word "Industry" on the center of the shield, a beehive; on each side of the
beehive, growing sego lilies; below the beehive and near the bottom of the
shield, the word "Utah," and below the word "Utah" and on the bottom of the
shield, the figures "1847"; with the appearance of being back of the shield
there shall be two American flags on flagstaffs placed crosswise with the flag
so draped that they will project beyond each side of the shield, the heads of
the flagstaffs appearing in front of the eagle's wings and the bottom of each
staff appearing over the face of the draped flag below the shield; below the
shield and flags and upon the blue field, the figures "1896"; around the
entire design, a narrow circle in gold.
